New York, session 2025-2026, S9193.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 52 of section 210-B of the 2 tax law, as added by section 4 of part DDD of chapter 59 of the laws of 3 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) General. In the case of a taxpayer that is an eligible farmer, 5 there shall be allowed a credit, to be computed as hereinafter provided 6 against the tax imposed by this article for taxable years beginning on 7 and after January first, two thousand [eighteen] twenty-eight. The 8 amount of the credit shall be [twenty-five] fifty percent of the fair 9 market value of the taxpayer's qualified donations made to any eligible 10 food pantry during the taxable year, not to exceed [five] ten thousand 11 dollars per taxable year. If the taxpayer is a partner in a partnership, 12 then the cap imposed by the preceding sentence shall be applied at the 13 entity level, so that the aggregate credit allowed to all partners of 14 such entity in the taxable year does not exceed [five] ten thousand 15 dollars. 16 § 2. Paragraph 1 of subsection (n-2) of section 606 of the tax law, 17 as added by section 1 of part DDD of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 (1) General. In the case of a taxpayer who is an eligible farmer, 20 there shall be allowed a credit, to be computed as hereinafter provided, 21 against the tax imposed by this article for taxable years beginning on 22 and after January first, two thousand [eighteen] twenty-eight. The 23 amount of the credit shall be [twenty-five] fifty percent of the fair 24 market value of the taxpayer's qualified donations made to any eligible 25 food pantry during the taxable year, not to exceed [five] ten thousand 26 dollars per taxable year. If the taxpayer is a partner in a partnership 27 or a shareholder of a New York S corporation, then the cap imposed by 28 the preceding sentence shall be applied at the entity level, so that the 29 aggregate credit allowed to all partners or shareholders of such entity 30 in the taxable year does not exceed [five] ten thousand dollars. 31 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14478-01-6